Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB372.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1 of the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act, is amended to read:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the [Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards] Energy Future Act.Section 2. The definitions of "alternative energy sources," "reporting period" and "Tier II alternative energy source" in section 2 of the act are amended and the section is amended by 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advanced nuclear." A nuclear fission or fusion reactor, including a prototype plant as defined in 10 CFR 50.2 (relating to definitions) and 52.1 (relating to definitions), with significant improvements compared to commercial nuclear reactors under construction as of the effective date of this definition, including the following improvements:(1) additional inherent safety features;(2) significantly lower levelized cost of electricity;(3) lower waste yields;(4) greater fuel utilization;(5) enhanced reliability;(6) increased proliferation resistance;(7) increased thermal efficiency; or(8) ability to integrate into electric and nonelectric applications.* * *"Alternative energy sources." The term shall include the following existing and new sources for the production of electricity:(1) Solar photovoltaic or other solar electric energy.(2) Solar thermal energy.(3) Wind power.(4) Large-scale hydropower, which shall mean the production of electric power by harnessing the hydroelectric potential of moving water impoundments, including pumped 20250SB0372PN0320 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 storage that does not meet the requirements of low-impact hydropower under paragraph (5).(5) Low-impact hydropower consisting of any technology that produces electric power and that harnesses the hydroelectric potential of moving water impoundments, provided such incremental hydroelectric development:(i) does not adversely change existing impacts to aquatic systems;(ii) meets the certification standards established by the Low Impact Hydropower Institute and American Rivers, Inc., or their successors;(iii) provides an adequate water flow for protection of aquatic life and for safe and effective fish passage;(iv) protects against erosion; and(v) protects cultural and historic resources.(6) Geothermal energy, which shall mean electricity produced by extracting hot water or steam from geothermal reserves in the earth's crust and supplied to steam turbines that drive generators to produce electricity.(7) Biomass energy, which shall mean the generation of electricity utilizing the following:(i) organic material from a plant that is grown for the purpose of being used to produce electricity or is protected by the Federal Conservation Reserve Program (CRP) and provided further that crop production on CRP lands does not prevent achievement of the water quality protection, soil erosion prevention or wildlife enhancement purposes for which the land was primarily set aside; or(ii) any solid nonhazardous, cellulosic waste 20250SB0372PN0320 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 material that is segregated from other waste materials, such as waste pallets, crates and landscape or right-of-way tree trimmings or agricultural sources, including orchard tree crops, vineyards, grain, legumes, sugar and other crop by-products or residues.(8) Biologically derived methane gas, which shall include methane from the anaerobic digestion of organic materials from yard waste, such as grass clippings and leaves, food waste, animal waste and sewage sludge. The term also includes landfill methane gas.(9) Fuel cells, which shall mean any electrochemical device that converts chemical energy in a hydrogen-rich fuel directly into electricity, heat and water without combustion.(10) Waste coal, which shall include the combustion of waste coal in facilities in which the waste coal was disposed or abandoned prior to July 31, 1982, or disposed of thereafter in a permitted coal refuse disposal site regardless of when disposed of, and used to generate electricity, or such other waste coal combustion meeting alternate eligibility requirements established by regulation. Facilities combusting waste coal shall use at a minimum a combined fluidized bed boiler and be outfitted with a limestone injection system and a fabric filter particulate removal system. Alternative energy credits shall be calculated based upon the proportion of waste coal utilized to produce electricity at the facility.(11) Coal mine methane, which shall mean methane gas emitting from abandoned or working coal mines.(12) Demand-side management consisting of the management of customer consumption of electricity or the demand for 20250SB0372PN0320 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electricity through the implementation of:(i) energy efficiency technologies, management practices or other strategies in residential, commercial, institutional or government customers that reduce electricity consumption by those customers;(ii) load management or demand response technologies, management practices or other strategies in residential, commercial, industrial, institutional and government customers that shift electric load from periods of higher demand to periods of lower demand; or(iii) industrial by-product technologies consisting of the use of a by-product from an industrial process, including the reuse of energy from exhaust gases or other manufacturing by-products that are used in the direct production of electricity at the facility of a customer.(13) Distributed generation system, which shall mean:(i) the small-scale power generation of electricity and useful thermal energy[.]; or(ii) a combined heat and power system.* * *"Carbon capture, utilization and storage technology." Technology that has the principal purpose of capturing, reusing, storing, sequestering or using carbon dioxide emissions to prevent carbon dioxide from entering the atmosphere whether constructed integral or adjacent to a coal-fired or natural gas-fired generation facility."Carbon constrained coal facility." As follows:(1) An electric generating facility located in this Commonwealth that uses primarily coal as a feedstock and that emits no more than 650 pounds of carbon dioxide per megawatt 20250SB0372PN0320 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hour of generated electricity averaged over one calendar year by 2026, no more than 214 pounds of carbon dioxide per megawatt hour of generated electricity averaged over one calendar year by 2031 and zero pounds of carbon dioxide per megawatt hour of generated electricity averaged over one calendar year by 2036.(2) The power block of the carbon constrained coal facility does not exceed allowable emission rates for sulfur dioxide, nitrogen oxides, carbon monoxide, methane, nitrous oxide, volatile organic compounds, particulates and mercury for a natural gas-fired combined-cycle facility the same size as and in the same location as the carbon constrained coal facility at the time the carbon constrained coal facility obtains an approved air permit.(3) The coal used by a carbon constrained coal facility is located in this Commonwealth."Carbon constrained energy facility." As follows:(1) An electric generating facility located in this Commonwealth that uses primarily natural gas, coal or hydrogen as a feedstock and that emits no more than 650 pounds of carbon dioxide per megawatt hour of generated electricity averaged over one calendar year by 2027, no more than 214 pounds of carbon dioxide per megawatt hour of generated electricity averaged over one calendar year by 2031 and net zero pounds of carbon dioxide per megawatt hour of generated electricity averaged over one calendar year by 2036.(2) The power block of the carbon constrained natural gas facility, carbon constrained coal facility or carbon constrained hydrogen facility shall not exceed allowable 20250SB0372PN0320 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 emission rates for sulfur dioxide, nitrogen oxides, carbon monoxide, methane, nitrous oxide, volatile organic compounds, particulates and mercury for a natural gas-fired combined-cycle facility the same size as and in the same location as the carbon constrained natural gas facility, carbon constrained coal facility or carbon constrained hydrogen facility at the time the carbon constrained energy facility obtains an approved air permit.(3) The gas, coal and hydrogen used by a carbon constrained energy facility is sourced in this Commonwealth."Carbon constrained energy system." A facility or energy system that uses carbon capture, utilization and storage technology that produces carbon emissions at or below the requirement under this act to generate electricity and delivers the electricity it generates to the distribution system of an electric distribution company or to the transmission system operated by a regional transmission organization."Carbon constrained hydrogen facility." As follows:(1) An electric generating facility located in this Commonwealth that uses primarily hydrogen as a feedstock and that emits no more than 650 pounds of carbon dioxide per megawatt hour of generated electricity averaged over one calendar year by 2026, no more than 214 pounds of carbon dioxide per megawatt hour of generated electricity averaged over one calendar year by 2031 and zero pounds of carbon dioxide per megawatt hour of generated electricity averaged over one calendar year by 2036, including the carbon dioxide emissions from the generation of the utilized hydrogen.(2) The power block of the carbon constrained hydrogen facility and generator of the utilized hydrogen does not 20250SB0372PN0320 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exceed allowable emission rates for sulfur dioxide, nitrogen oxides, carbon monoxide, methane, nitrous oxide, volatile organic compounds, particulates and mercury for a natural gas-fired combined-cycle facility the same size as and in the same location as the carbon constrained hydrogen facility at the time the carbon constrained hydrogen facility obtains an approved air permit.(3) The hydrogen and associated feedstock used by a carbon constrained hydrogen facility is located in this Commonwealth."Carbon constrained natural gas facility." As follows:(1) An electric generating facility located in this Commonwealth that uses primarily natural gas as a feedstock and that emits no more than 650 pounds of carbon dioxide per megawatt hour of generated electricity averaged over one calendar year by 2026, no more than 214 pounds of carbon dioxide per megawatt hour of generated electricity averaged over one calendar year by 2031 and zero pounds of carbon dioxide per megawatt hour of generated electricity averaged over one calendar year by 2036.(2) The power block of the carbon constrained natural gas facility does not exceed allowable emission rates for sulfur dioxide, nitrogen oxides, carbon monoxide, methane, nitrous oxide, volatile organic compounds, particulates and mercury for a natural gas-fired combined-cycle facility the same size as and in the same location as the carbon constrained natural gas facility at the time the carbon constrained natural gas facility obtains an approved air permit.(3) The natural gas used by a carbon constrained natural 20250SB0372PN0320 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 gas facility is located in this Commonwealth."Combined heat and power system." A combined heat and power system installed on a commercial, institutional or industrial facility site within this Commonwealth that is a qualified facility under the Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (Public Law 95-617, 92 Stat. 3117) and has an annual operating efficiency of at least 60%. A combined heat and power system shall qualify as a Tier II alternative energy source for up to 50 megawatts of combined generation on a site.* * *"Eligibility period." The period of time, measured in energy years, during which a selected nuclear power plant may receive zero emissions carbon certificates under section 3.1."Eligible nuclear power plant." A nuclear power plant certified by the commission under section 3.1(e)."Energy year." The 12-month period from June 1 through May 31, numbered according to the calendar year in which it ends.* * *"Nuclear power plant." An individual electric-generating unit utilizing nuclear fuel to produce electric power.* * *"Renewable energy." The following:(1) Energy derived from sunlight, wind, falling water, biomass, sustainable or otherwise, waste, landfill gas, municipal solid waste, wave motion, tides and geothermal power. The term includes the proportion of the thermal or electric energy from a facility that results from the cofiring of biomass.(2) The term does not include energy derived from coal, oil, natural gas or nuclear power.20250SB0372PN0320 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The term does not include energy waste heat from fossil-fired facilities or electricity generated from pumped storage but includes run-of-river generation from a combined pumped-storage and run-of-river facility."Reporting [period."] period" or "reporting year." The 12-month period from June 1 through May 31. A reporting year shall be numbered according to the calendar year in which it begins and ends.* * *"Selected nuclear power plant." An eligible nuclear power plant located in this Commonwealth selected by the commission to participate in the Zero Emissions Carbon Certificate Program under section 3.1.* * *"Tier II alternative energy source." Energy derived from:(1) Waste coal from a carbon constrained coal facility.(2) Distributed generation systems.(3) Demand-side management.(4) Large-scale hydropower.(5) Municipal solid waste.(6) Generation of electricity utilizing by-products of the pulping process and wood manufacturing process, including bark, wood chips, sawdust and lignin in spent pulping liquors.[(7) Integrated combined coal gasification technology.](8) A Tier I alternative energy source."Tier III carbon constrained energy source." Energy derived from a Pennsylvania-sourced carbon constrained energy facility."Tier IV carbon constrained energy source." Energy derived from Pennsylvania-existing nuclear generation.20250SB0372PN0320 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Tier V carbon constrained energy source." Energy derived from Pennsylvania-advanced nuclear generation."Tier VI carbon constrained energy source." Energy derived from a Pennsylvania-sourced carbon constrained hydrogen facility.* * *Section 3. Section 3(a)(1) and (3), (b), (f) and (g)(2) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 3. Alternative energy portfolio standards.(a) General compliance and cost recovery.--(1) From the effective date of this act through and including [the 15th year after enactment of this act and each year thereafter] 2045, the electric energy sold by an electric distribution company or electric generation supplier to retail electric customers in this Commonwealth shall be comprised of electricity generated from alternative energy sources and in the percentage amounts as described under [subsections (b) and (c)] this section.* * *(3) All costs for:(i) the purchase of electricity generated from alternative energy sources, including the costs of the regional transmission organization, in excess of the regional transmission organization real-time locational marginal pricing, or its successor, at the delivery point of the alternative energy source for the electrical production of the alternative energy sources; and(ii) payments for alternative energy credits, in both cases that are voluntarily acquired by an electric 20250SB0372PN0320 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distribution company during the cost recovery period on behalf of its customers shall be deferred as a regulatory asset by the electric distribution company and fully recovered, with a return on the unamortized balance, pursuant to an automatic energy adjustment clause under 66 Pa.C.S. § 1307 (relating to sliding scale of rates; adjustments) as a cost of generation supply under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2807 (relating to duties of electric distribution companies) in the first year after the expiration of its cost-recovery period. After the cost-recovery period, any direct or indirect costs for the purchase by electric distribution companies of resources to comply with this section, including, but not limited to, the purchase of electricity generated from alternative energy sources, payments for alternative energy credits, cost of credits banked, payments to any third party administrators for performance under this act and costs levied by a regional transmission organization to ensure that alternative energy sources are reliable, shall be recovered on a full and current basis pursuant to an automatic energy adjustment clause under 66 Pa.C.S. § 1307 as a cost of generation supply under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2807.(b) Tier I and solar photovoltaic shares through the 20th reporting year.--(1) Two years after the effective date of this act, at least 1.5% of the electric energy sold by an electric distribution company or electric generation supplier to retail electric customers in this Commonwealth shall be generated from Tier I alternative energy sources. Except as 20250SB0372PN0320 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided in this section, the minimum percentage of electric energy required to be sold to retail electric customers from alternative energy sources shall increase to 2% three years after the effective date of this act. The minimum percentage of electric energy required to be sold to retail electric customers from alternative energy sources shall increase by at least 0.5% each year so that at least 8% of the electric energy sold by an electric distribution company or electric generation supplier to retail electric customers in that certificated territory in the 15th reporting year after the effective date of this subsection is sold from Tier I alternative energy resources.(2) [The] Through the 20th reporting year ending May 31, 2026, the total percentage of the electric energy sold by an electric distribution company or electric generation supplier to retail electric customers in this Commonwealth that must be sold from solar photovoltaic technologies is:(i) 0.0013% for June 1, 2006, through May 31, 2007.(ii) 0.0030% for June 1, 2007, through May 31, 2008.(iii) 0.0063% for June 1, 2008, through May 31, 2009.(iv) 0.0120% for June 1, 2009, through May 31, 2010.(v) 0.0203% for June 1, 2010, through May 31, 2011.(vi) 0.0325% for June 1, 2011, through May 31, 2012.(vii) 0.0510% for June 1, 2012, through May 31, 2013.(viii) 0.0840% for June 1, 2013, through May 31, 2014.(ix) 0.1440% for June 1, 2014, through May 31, 2015.(x) 0.2500% for June 1, 2015, through May 31, 2016.20250SB0372PN0320 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xi) 0.2933% for June 1, 2016, through May 31, 2017.(xii) 0.3400% for June 1, 2017, through May 31, 2018.(xiii) 0.3900% for June 1, 2018, through May 31, 2019.(xiv) 0.4433% for June 1, 2019, through May 31, 2020.(xv) 0.5000% for June 1, 2020, [and thereafter.] through May 31, 2026.(3) Upon commencement of the beginning of the 6th reporting year, the commission shall undertake a review of the compliance by electric distribution companies and electric generation suppliers with the requirements of this act. The review shall also include the status of alternative energy technologies within this Commonwealth and the capacity to add additional alternative energy resources. [The commission shall use the results of this review to recommend to the General Assembly additional compliance goals beyond year 15.] The commission shall work with the department in evaluating the future alternative energy resource potential.(b.1) Tier I and solar photovoltaic shares beginning in the 21st reporting year.--(1) Each electric distribution company and electric generation supplier shall purchase, at a minimum, an amount of Tier I alternative energy credits equal to the percentage of electric energy required to be sold by an electric distribution company or electric generation supplier to retail electric customers from Tier I alternative energy sources for that reporting year and as provided under this subsection. Beginning in the 21st reporting year commencing 20250SB0372PN0320 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on June 1, 2026, the minimum percentage of electric energy required to be sold by an electric distribution company or electric generation supplier to retail electric customers in this Commonwealth from Tier I alternative energy sources for each reporting year is:(i) 10.444% for June 1, 2026, through May 31, 2027.(ii) 13.703% for June 1, 2027, through May 31, 2028.(iii) 16.961% for June 1, 2028, through May 31, 2029.(iv) 20.22% for June 1, 2029, through May 31, 2030.(v) 23.497% for June 1, 2030, through May 31, 2031.(vi) 26.737% for June 1, 2031, through May 31, 2032.(vii) 30% for June 1, 2032, through May 31, 2033, and thereafter.(2) (i) Beginning in the 21st reporting year commencing on June 1, 2026, the minimum percentage of the electric energy sold by an electric distribution company or electric generation supplier to retail electric customers in this Commonwealth that must be sold from solar photovoltaic technologies that are owned and operated by customer-generators shall be:(A) 0.65% for June 1, 2026, through May 31, 2027.(B) 0.85% for June 1, 2027, through May 31, 2028.(C) 1.05% for June 1, 2028, through May 31, 2029.(D) 1.25% for June 1, 2029, through May 31, 2030.(E) 1.55% for June 1, 2030, through May 31, 20250SB0372PN0320 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 2031.(F) 1.95% for June 1, 2031, through May 31, 2032.(G) 2.5% for June 1, 2032, through May 31, 2033, and thereafter.(ii) For purposes of subparagraph (i), solar photovoltaic technologies that are owned and operated by customer-generators include any of the following:(A) Solar photovoltaic technologies that were certified on or before May 31, 2024, under subsection (b)(2) and qualify to generate solar alternative energy credits in accordance with section 3.2.(B) Solar photovoltaic technologies that qualify as customer-generators under subsection (b)(2).(3) Beginning in the 21st reporting year commencing on June 1, 2026, and each reporting year thereafter, a solar photovoltaic system that is certified before or on May 31, 2024, provided the system meets the requirements under section 3.2, shall be included in the percentage of the required solar photovoltaic energy systems owned and operated by customer-generators under paragraph (2).(4) A solar photovoltaic energy system owned and operated by a customer-generator in accordance with paragraph (2) shall remain eligible to receive solar alternative energy credits for no more than 15 years beginning on June 1, 2026, or 15 years beginning on the date of the solar photovoltaic energy system's certification if the certification occurs after June 1, 2026. Upon expiration of the 15-year period specified under this paragraph, the solar photovoltaic energy system shall be eligible for alternative energy credits 20250SB0372PN0320 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided for Tier I alternative energy sources under paragraph (1).(5) Beginning in the 19th reporting year commencing on June 1, 2026, the minimum percentage of the electric energy sold by an electric distribution company or electric generation supplier to retail electric customers in this Commonwealth that must be sold from solar photovoltaic technologies from non-customer-generators is:(i) 0.94% for June 1, 2026, through May 31, 2027. (ii) 1.54% for June 1, 2027, through May 31, 2028. (iii) 2.34% for June 1, 2028, through May 31, 2029. (iv) 3.34% for June 1, 2029, through May 31, 2030. (v) 4.54% for June 1, 2030, through May 31, 2031. (vi) 5.94% for June 1, 2031, through May 31, 2032. (vii) 7.5% for June 1, 2032, through May 31, 2033, and thereafter.(6) No later than one year after the effective date of this paragraph, the commission shall establish regulations to ensure diversification across all customer-generators under paragraph (2), including, but not limited to, solar photovoltaic systems that are interconnected at residential or commercial locations or customer-generators whose systems are for virtual meter aggregation.(7) This subsection shall not apply to the certification of a solar photovoltaic energy system with a contract for the sale and purchase of alternative energy credits derived from solar photovoltaic energy sources entered into before or on May 31, 2026, provided that the system meets the requirements under section 3.2.(8) This subsection shall apply to a contract for the 20250SB0372PN0320 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sale and purchase of alternative energy credits derived from solar photovoltaic energy sources entered into or renewed for reporting years commencing after May 31, 2026.* * *(c.1) Tier III share.--Of the electrical energy required to be sold from a Tier III carbon constrained energy source, the percentage that must be from these technologies is for:(1) Energy years 2028 through 2032 - 5.5%.(2) Energy years 2033 through 2037 - 11%.(3) Energy years 2038 through 2050 - 17.5%.(c.2) Tier IV share.--Of the electrical energy required to be sold from a Tier IV carbon constrained energy source, the percentage that must be from these technologies is for:(1) Energy years 2028 through 2032 - 2.5%.(2) Energy years 2033 through 2037 - 5%.(3) Energy years 2038 through 2050 - 7.5%.(c.3) Tier V share.--Of the electrical energy required to be sold from a Tier V carbon constrained energy source, the percentage that must be from these technologies is for:(1) Energy years 2028 through 2032 - 0.5%.(2) Energy years 2033 through 2037 - 1%.(3) Energy years 2038 through 2050 - 2%.(c.4) Tier VI share.--Of the electrical energy required to be sold from a Tier VI carbon constrained energy source, the percentage that must be from these technologies is for:(1) Energy years 2028 through 2032 - 0.5%.(2) Energy years 2033 through 2037 - 1%.(3) Energy years 2038 through 2050 - 2%.* * *(f) Alternative compliance payment.--20250SB0372PN0320 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) At the end of each program reporting year, the program administrator shall provide a report to the commission and to each covered electric distribution company showing their status level of alternative energy acquisition.(2) The commission shall conduct a review of each determination made under subsections (b), (b.1) and (c). If, after notice and hearing, the commission determines that an electric distribution company or electric generation supplier has failed to comply with subsections (b), (b.1) and (c), the commission shall impose an alternative compliance payment on that electric distribution company or electric generation supplier.(3) [The] Through May 31, 2026, the alternative compliance payment, with the exception of the solar photovoltaic share compliance requirement set forth in subsection (b)(2), shall be $45 times the number of additional alternative energy credits needed in order to comply with subsection (b) or (c).(4) [The] Through May 31, 2026, the alternative compliance payment for the solar photovoltaic share required under subsection (b)(2) shall be 200% of the average market value of solar renewable energy credits sold during the reporting period within the service region of the regional transmission organization, including, where applicable, the levelized up-front rebates received by sellers of solar [renewable] alternative energy credits in other jurisdictions in the PJM Interconnection, L.L.C. transmission organization (PJM) or its successor.(4.1) Beginning June 1, 2026, the alternative compliance payment, with the exception of the customer-generator solar 20250SB0372PN0320 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 photovoltaic share compliance requirement specified under subsection (b.1)(2), shall be $45 multiplied by the number of additional alternative energy credits needed in order to comply with subsection (b.1) or (c).(4.2) Beginning June 1, 2026, the alternative compliance payment for the customer-generator solar photovoltaic share compliance requirement specified under subsection (b.1)(2) shall be as follows:(i) An amount equal to the product of $125 multiplied by the number of additional alternative energy credits required to comply with subsection (b.1)(2) from June 1, 2026, through May 31, 2031.(ii) An amount equal to the product of $100 multiplied by the number of additional alternative energy credits required to comply with subsection (b.1)(2) from June 1, 2031, through May 31, 2033.(iii) Beginning with the reporting year commencing on June 1, 2033, and each reporting year thereafter, the alternative compliance payment required for solar photovoltaic energy systems under subsection (b.1)(2) shall decrease by $5 from the previous reporting year until the alternative compliance payment is$45.(5) The commission shall establish a process to provide for, at least annually, a review of the alternative energy market within this Commonwealth and the service territories of the regional transmission organizations that manage the transmission system in any part of this Commonwealth. The commission will use the results of this study to identify any needed changes to the cost associated with the alternative 20250SB0372PN0320 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compliance payment program. If the commission finds that the costs associated with the alternative compliance payment program must be changed, the commission shall present these findings to the General Assembly for legislative enactment.(g) Transfer [to sustainable development funds] of alternative compliance payments.--* * *(2) The alternative compliance payments shall be utilized solely for [projects] any of the following:(i) Projects that will increase the amount of electric energy generated from alternative energy resources for purposes of compliance with subsections (b), (b.1) and (c).(ii) Workforce development programs to train workers in renewable energy industries.* * *Section 4. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 3.1. Zero Emissions Carbon Certificate Program.(a) Establishment.--No later than 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, the commission shall allow the commencement of a program providing for the issuance by the commission of a zero emissions carbon certificate. The commission shall adopt, after notice, the opportunity for comment and public hearing, an order establishing the Zero Emissions Carbon Certificate Program for selected nuclear power plants which shall include:(1) A method and application process for determination of the eligibility and selection of eligible nuclear power plants.(2) Establishment of a mechanism for each electric 20250SB0372PN0320 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distribution company to purchase ZECs from selected nuclear power plants and a mechanism for the commission to effectuate the provisions of subsection (i).(b) ZEC program application.--(1) As part of an application submitted to the commission under subsection (c), a nuclear power plant seeking to participate in the ZEC program shall provide to the commission any financial information requested by the commission pertaining to the nuclear power plant, including certified cost projections over the next three energy years, including operation and maintenance expenses, fuel expenses, including spent fuel expenses, nonfuel capital expenses, fully allocated overhead costs, the cost of operational risks and market risks that would be avoided by ceasing operations and any other information, financial or otherwise, to demonstrate that the nuclear power plant's fuel diversity, air quality and other environmental attributes are at risk of loss because the nuclear power plant is projected to not fully cover its costs and risks, or alternatively is projected to not fully cover its costs and risks, including its risk-adjusted cost of capital.(2) An application submitted to the commission under subsection (c) shall include a certification that the nuclear power plant will cease operations within three years unless the nuclear power plant experiences a material financial change. The certification shall specify the necessary steps required to be completed to cease the nuclear power plant's operations.(3) The financial and other information required under this subsection may be submitted on a confidential basis and 20250SB0372PN0320 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be treated and maintained as confidential by the commission and, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, shall not be subject to public disclosure. The commission and the Attorney General shall jointly approve the disclosure of confidential information to a party that the commission and the Attorney General deem essential to aid the commission in making the determinations required under this subsection, provided that the party is not in a position that disclosure could harm competition and the party agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality of the confidential information.(4) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Market risks." The term shall include, but not be limited to, the risk of a forced outage and the associated costs arising from contractual obligations and the risk that output from the nuclear power plant may not be able to be sold at projected levels."Operational risks." The term shall include, but not be limited to, the risk that operating costs will be higher than anticipated because of new regulatory mandates or equipment failures and the risk that per megawatt hour costs will be higher than anticipated because of a lower than expected capacity factor.(c) Submission of application.--No later than 210 days after the effective date of this subsection, a nuclear power plant seeking to participate in the ZEC program shall submit its application to the commission.(d) List.--The commission shall complete a proceeding no 20250SB0372PN0320 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 later than 330 days after the effective date of this subsection and shall adopt, after notice, the opportunity for comment and public hearing, an order establishing a rank-ordered list of the nuclear power plants certified as eligible to receive ZECs, and establishing which eligible nuclear power plants have been selected to receive ZECs under this section. If the commission determines that no nuclear plant that applied satisfies the objectives of this section, the commission shall be under no obligation to certify any nuclear power plant as an eligible nuclear power plant.(e) Requirements.--To be certified by the commission as an eligible nuclear power plant, a nuclear power plant shall:(1) Be licensed to operate by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission by the effective date of this paragraph and through calendar year 2030 or later.(2) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commission that the nuclear power plant makes a significant and material contribution to the air quality in this Commonwealth by minimizing emissions that result from electricity consumed in this Commonwealth, minimizing harmful emissions that adversely affect the residents of this Commonwealth and if the nuclear power plant were to be retired, that retirement would significantly and negatively impact this Commonwealth's ability to comply with State air emissions reduction requirements.(3) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commission, through the financial and other confidential information submitted to the commission under subsection (b), and any other information required by the commission, which information may be submitted on a confidential basis and 20250SB0372PN0320 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be treated and maintained as confidential by the commission and, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, shall not be subject to public disclosure that the nuclear power plant's fuel diversity, air quality and other environmental attributes are at risk of loss because the nuclear power plant is projected to not fully cover its costs and risks, or alternatively is projected to not cover its costs, including its risk-adjusted cost of capital, and that the nuclear power plant will cease operations within three years unless the nuclear power plant experiences a material financial change.(4) Certify annually that the nuclear power plant does not receive any direct or indirect payment or credit under a Federal law, rule, regulation, order, tariff or other action, or a law, rule, regulation, order, tariff or other action of this Commonwealth or any other state, or a regional compact, despite its reasonable best efforts to obtain any such payment or credit, for its fuel diversity, resilience, air quality or other environmental attributes that will eliminate the need for the nuclear power plant to retire, except for any payment or credit received under this section.(5) Submit an application fee to the commission in an amount to be determined by the commission, but which shall not exceed $250,000, to be used to defray the costs incurred by the commission to administer the ZEC program.(f) Ranking.--The commission shall rank eligible nuclear power plants from first to last by considering how well the nuclear power plants satisfy the criteria provided under this section and other relevant factors, including sustainability or long-term commitment to nuclear energy production in a manner 20250SB0372PN0320 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that supports this Commonwealth's cost-effective transition to a zero carbon energy supply. Two or more eligible nuclear power plants may not have the same ranking.(g) Selection.--(1) The commission shall select eligible nuclear power plants to receive ZECs according to their ranking. Beginning with the top-ranked eligible nuclear power plant and continuing in rank order, the commission shall continue to select nuclear power plants until the point at which the combined number of megawatt hours of electricity produced in the energy year immediately prior to the effective date of this section by all selected nuclear power plants equals 40% of the total number of megawatt hours of electricity distributed by electric public utilities in this Commonwealth in the energy year immediately prior to the effective date of this section.(2) The commission may not select an eligible nuclear power plant to receive ZECs if the addition of the electricity produced by that nuclear power plant in the energy year immediately prior to the effective date of this section by the selected nuclear power plants ranked ahead of that plant on the rank-ordered list exceeds 40% of the total number of megawatt hours of electricity distributed by electric public utilities in this Commonwealth in the energy year immediately prior to the effective date of this section.(3) A selected nuclear power plant shall be eligible to receive ZECs 330 days after the effective date of this paragraph. In the first energy year in which an eligible nuclear power plant is selected, the selected nuclear power plant shall receive a number of ZECs equal to the number of 20250SB0372PN0320 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 megawatt hours of electricity it produced in that energy year starting on the date of the eligible nuclear power plant's selection. In each energy year thereafter, each selected nuclear power plant shall receive a number of ZECs equal to the number of megawatt hours of electricity that it produced in that energy year.(h) Eligibility periods.--(1) Selected nuclear power plants shall initially receive ZECs for an eligibility period that shall run through the end of the first energy year in which the nuclear power plant is selected, plus an additional three energy years.(2) No later than 13 months prior to the conclusion of the initial eligibility period established under paragraph (1), and no later than 13 months prior to the conclusion of each three energy year eligibility period thereafter, a nuclear power plant may demonstrate its eligibility to the commission and the commission may certify the nuclear power plant's eligibility to receive ZECs for additional eligibility periods of three energy years, consistent with the provisions of this section.(3) A selected nuclear power plant shall annually certify to the commission that the nuclear power plant will continue operations at full or near full capacity for the duration of the period of its eligibility to receive ZECs, except with respect to nuclear power plant shutdowns for necessary maintenance and refueling.(i) Price and purchase of ZECs by electric distribution companies.--(1) The commission shall determine the price of a ZEC each energy year by dividing the total number of dollars held 20250SB0372PN0320 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by electric public utilities in the accounts established under subsection (j)(1) at the end of the prior energy year by the greater of:(i) 40% of the total number of megawatt hours of electricity distributed by the electric public utilities in this Commonwealth in the prior energy year; or(ii) the number of megawatt hours of electricity generated in the prior energy year by the selected nuclear power plants.(2) Each electric distribution company in this Commonwealth shall be required to begin to purchase ZECs on a monthly basis from each selected nuclear power plant with payment to follow within 90 days after the conclusion of the first energy year in which selected nuclear power plants receive ZECs and within 90 days after the conclusion of each subsequent energy year. The number of ZECs an electric distribution company shall be required to purchase shall equal the total number of ZECs received by the selected nuclear power plants for the prior energy year under subsection (g) multiplied by the percentage of electricity distributed in this Commonwealth by the electric distribution company as compared to other electric public utilities in this Commonwealth.(3) To ensure that a selected nuclear power plant does not receive double-payment for its fuel diversity, resilience, air quality or other environmental attributes, the commission shall annually determine the dollar amount received by the selected nuclear power plant in an energy year under a Federal law, rule, regulation, order, tariff or other action, or a law, rule, regulation, order, tariff or 20250SB0372PN0320 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other action of this Commonwealth or any other state, or a regional compact referenced in subsection (e)(4). Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the number of ZECs purchased by each electric distribution company from a selected nuclear power plant for an energy year shall be reduced by the number of ZECs equal in value to the dollar amount determined by the commission in this paragraph, multiplied by the percentage of electricity distributed in this Commonwealth by the electric distribution company as compared to other electric public utilities in this Commonwealth. To the extent that the commission determines that a selected nuclear plant receives revenues for its fuel diversity, resilience, air quality or other environmental attributes, the commission shall immediately reduce the number of ZECs on a prospective basis consistent with the level of the revenues.(i.1) ZEC Fund.--The ZEC Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury. Money in the ZEC Fund is appropriated to the commission on a continuing basis for the purpose of implementing the ZEC program. All money received by the commission under this section shall be deposited into the ZEC Fund.(j) Recovery of costs.--(1) The commission shall order the full recovery of all costs associated with the electric distribution company's required procurement of ZECs, and with the commission's implementation of the ZEC program, through a nonbypassable, irrevocable charge imposed on the electric distribution company's retail distribution customers. Within 150 days after the effective date of this paragraph, each electric distribution company shall file with the commission a tariff 20250SB0372PN0320 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to recover from the electric distribution company's retail distribution customers as follows:(i) For an electric distribution company whose rates are regulated by the commission, the commission shall determine the appropriate charges for the electric distribution company's tariff that permit recovery of the incremental cost of compliance subject to the retail rate impact limits provided under subparagraph (2).(ii) An electric distribution company shall recover the incremental cost of compliance with the renewable energy standards. An electric distribution company may not comply with the renewable energy standards to the extent that, as determined by the commission, recovery of the incremental cost of compliance will have a retail rate impact that exceeds any of the following:(A) $3.00 per month per residential customer meter.(B) $16.58 per month per commercial secondary customer meter.(C) $187.50 per month per commercial primary or industrial customer meter.(2) Within 60 days after the tariff filing under paragraph (1), after notice, the opportunity for comment and public hearing, the commission shall approve the tariff, provided that the tariff is consistent with the provisions of this subsection. No later than the date of the commission's order establishing the initial selected nuclear power plants to receive ZECs, each electric distribution company shall implement the tariff and begin collecting from its retail distribution customers the approved charge. Revenues 20250SB0372PN0320 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 collected by the electric distribution company from the nonbypassable, irrevocable charge shall be placed in a separate, interest-bearing account and shall be used solely to purchase ZECs, and to reimburse the commission for reasonable, verifiable costs the commission incurs to implement the ZEC program to the extent the commission's costs exceed the application fees collected by the commission under subsection (e)(5).(3) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, an electric distribution company shall not be required to purchase any additional number of ZECs if the cost of the additional number of ZECs exceeds the revenues deposited in the electric distribution company's separate, interest-bearing account, created under paragraph (2), for that energy year, after subtracting the reasonable, verifiable costs incurred by the commission during that energy year to implement the ZEC program, which costs shall be remitted to the commission and deposited into the ZEC Fund each energy year in a manner to be determined by the commission. Excess money in an electric distribution company's separate, interest-bearing account shall be refunded to its retail distribution customers at the end of each energy year.(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1), and to ensure that the ZEC program remains affordable to retail distribution customers in this Commonwealth, the commission may reduce the charge imposed by paragraph (1) starting in the second three-year eligibility period and for each subsequent three-year eligibility period thereafter, provided that the commission determines that a reduced charge will nonetheless be sufficient to achieve the Commonwealth's air 20250SB0372PN0320 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 quality and other environmental objectives by preventing the retirement of the nuclear power plants that meet the eligibility criteria established under subsections (d) and (e).(5) If the commission reduces the charge imposed by paragraph (1), the reduction shall be applicable to the next eligibility period only and the commission shall make its determination no later than 13 months prior to the start of that eligibility period. Within 30 days thereafter, each electric distribution company shall file, in lieu of the tariff described in paragraph (1), a tariff consistent with the commission's determination. Within 60 days after filing of the tariff, after notice, the opportunity for comment and public hearing, the commission shall approve the revised tariff, provided that it is consistent with the commission's determination. The revised tariff shall take effect starting in the next eligibility period.(6) If the commission does not certify any nuclear power plants for a subsequent eligibility period under this section, the commission may reduce the charge imposed under paragraph (1) to ensure that the ZEC program remains affordable to retail distribution customers in this Commonwealth in the final year of the first eligibility period if the commission determines that a reduced charge will be sufficient to achieve the Commonwealth's air quality and other environmental objectives by preventing the retirement of the nuclear power plants that meet the eligibility criteria established under subsections (d) and (e).(7) For the second three-year eligibility period, and 20250SB0372PN0320 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 every subsequent eligibility period thereafter, a selected nuclear power plant shall pay a renewal fee to the commission in an amount to be determined by the commission, but which shall not exceed $250,000, to be used to defray the costs incurred by the commission to administer the ZEC program.(k) Performance.--(1) A selected nuclear power plant shall be excused from performance, including, but not limited to, the sale of ZECs, and a payment from an electric distribution company shall not be due to the selected nuclear power plant, if:(i) the selected nuclear power plant suspends or ceases operations, despite the selected nuclear power plant's reasonable efforts to continue operations, due to an event beyond its control, including, but not limited to, acts of God, flood, drought, earthquake, storm, fire, lightning, epidemic, war, riot, labor dispute, labor or material shortage, sabotage or explosion. The selected nuclear power plant shall no longer be excused from performance, and a payment from an electric distribution company shall be due, after conclusion of the event;(ii) the General Assembly enacts a law imposing a significant new tax, special assessment or fee on the generation of electricity, the ownership or leasehold of a generating unit or the privilege or occupation of the generation, ownership or leasehold of generation units by a selected nuclear power plant;(iii) a Federal or State law is enacted that materially reduces the value of a ZEC or the commission exercises its discretion to reduce the amount of the per-kilowatt-hour charge under subsection (j)(3);20250SB0372PN0320 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) the selected nuclear power plant requires capital expenditures in excess of $40,000,000 that were neither known nor reasonably foreseeable at the time it was selected to receive ZECs, and the capital expenditures are expenditures that a prudent owner or operator of a selected nuclear power plant would not undertake; or(v) the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission terminates the selected nuclear power plant's license.(2) If a selected nuclear power plant ceases operations during an eligibility period for any reason other than those specified under this subsection, the selected nuclear power plant shall pay a charge to the electric distribution companies that purchased ZECs from the selected nuclear power plant in an amount equal to the compensation received for the sale of ZECs since the commission's last determination of the selected nuclear power plant's eligibility to receive ZECs. An electric distribution company shall provide a refund to its retail distribution customers in an amount equal to the charge paid by a selected nuclear power plant to the electric distribution company under this paragraph.(3) The owner of a selected nuclear power plant shall, within two years after receiving ZECs, submit a plan to the commission to retain, retrain or compensate personnel whose employment would be eliminated as a direct result of the cessation of the selected nuclear power plant's operations, including an alternative economic development plan for communities that rely on the selected nuclear power plant for a substantial portion of the community's tax revenues.(l) Employee layoffs.--A selected nuclear power plant may 20250SB0372PN0320 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not lay off any personnel unless the layoff is due to employee misconduct or underperformance issues or due to the suspension or cessation of the selected nuclear power plant's operations as provided under subsection (k).(m) Study and report by selected nuclear power plant.--The owner of a selected nuclear power plant shall, within two years after receiving ZECs, conduct a study and prepare a written report in cooperation with selected experts, to determine the optimal use of dry cask storage of spent nuclear fuel at its site, considering environmental impacts, worker safety and cost impacts.(n) Study and report by commission.--No later than 10 years after the effective date of this section, the commission shall conduct a study to evaluate the efficacy of the ZEC program and submit a written report to the Governor and the General Assembly. In conducting the study, the commission shall evaluate the ZEC program's effect on the premature retirement of nuclear power plants, its effect on the air quality and environment in this Commonwealth and its contribution to a more reliable energy supply by assuring fuel diversity. The study shall also evaluate the ZEC program's benefits and costs to ratepayers. The written report shall:(1) Summarize the study and analysis conducted under subsection (a).(2) Discuss and quantify the potential benefits and costs associated with the ZEC program.(3) Recommend any changes to the ZEC program or whether the ZEC program should continue.(4) Recommend whether the ZEC program should be expanded to include other technologies.20250SB0372PN0320 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (o) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"ZEC." A zero emissions carbon certificate established by the commission under subsection (a)."ZEC program." The Zero Emissions Carbon Certificate Program established by the commission under subsection (a).Section 3.2. Solar photovoltaic technology requirements.(a) System requirements.--Notwithstanding section 4, in order to qualify as an alternative energy source eligible to meet the solar photovoltaic share of the compliance requirements under section 3, a solar photovoltaic system must do one of the following:(1) Directly deliver the electricity that the solar photovoltaic system generates to a retail customer of an electric distribution company or to the distribution system operated by an electric distribution company operating in this Commonwealth and currently obligated to meet the compliance requirements specified under section 3.(2) Directly connect to the electric system of an electric cooperative or municipal electric system operating in this Commonwealth.(3) Directly connect to the electric transmission system at a location within the service territory of an electric distribution company operating in this Commonwealth.(b) Construction.-- (1) Nothing under this section or section 4 shall be construed to affect any of the following:(i) A certification originating in this Commonwealth and granted before the effective date of this 20250SB0372PN0320 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subparagraph of a solar photovoltaic energy generator as a qualifying alternative energy source eligible to meet the solar photovoltaic share of this Commonwealth's alternative energy portfolio compliance requirements under section 3.(ii) A certification of a solar photovoltaic system with a binding written contract for the sale and purchase of alternative energy credits derived from solar photovoltaic energy sources entered into before October 30, 2017.(2) This section shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after October 30, 2017.Section 8.1. Decarbonization.(a) Minimum reduction schedule.--The minimum reduction of carbon dioxide emissions as a percentage of 2020 emissions from the generation of all of the electric energy sold by an electric distribution company or electric generation supplier to retail electric customers in this Commonwealth shall be as follows:(1) 2.5% for energy year 2024.(2) 13.1% for energy year 2028.(3) 14.7% for energy year 2032.(4) 23% for energy year 2036.(5) 37.9% for energy year 2040.(6) 47.9% for energy year 2044.(7) 66% for energy year 2048.(8) 100% for energy year 2052 and thereafter.(b) Relief.--An electric distribution company may petition the commission for relief from the requirements under subsection (a) on the basis that the requirement would threaten the reliability or security of electric service to customers. The 20250SB0372PN0320 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission shall consider in-State and regional transmission entity resources and shall evaluate the reliability in ruling upon a petition for relief.(c) Carbon constrained energy credit.--The commission shall complete a proceeding to allow for the issuance of carbon constrained energy credits to carbon constrained energy systems. A carbon constrained energy credit shall be a tradable instrument that is used to establish, verify and monitor compliance with this section. A unit of credit shall equal one megawatt hour of electricity from a carbon constrained source. The carbon constrained energy credit shall remain the property of the carbon constrained energy system until the carbon constrained energy credit is voluntarily transferred by the carbon constrained energy system.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0372PN0320 - 38 - 123456789101112131415